Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 6. Laying Out Winter Roads and Lumber Roads

§ 955.
Winter roads.

When a public highway is so obstructed by snow that travel is impracticable, the selectboard of the town may immediately lay out, prepare, and open a winter highway for travel in place of the obstructed highway. The highway shall be continued only during the winter in which it is laid out.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 956.
Damages.

Before opening a winter highway, the selectboard shall follow the procedures established in section 923 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 957.
Preparation for winter highway.

When the selectboard determines that a winter highway is likely to be needed, it may cause preparation to be made, using the same procedures described in section 923 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 958.
Laying out roads for removal of lumber.

If it becomes necessary for the practical removal of lumber, wood, or other material to pass through the lands of a person other than those of the owner of the land from which the lumber, wood, or other material is to be removed, the selectboard may lay out a right-of-way through the land of any person for these purposes.
The selectboard shall follow the procedures established by section 923 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 959.
Use and discontinuance.

The selectmen may fix the length of time and conditions of use for the right-of-way.
They may order it closed or discontinued when in their judgment it is necessary.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.